Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3507
Multiple beneficiaries; separate custodial trusts; survivorship.

(a) Beneficial interests in a custodial trust created for multiple beneficiaries are deemed to be separate custodial trusts of equal undivided interests for each beneficiary. Except in a transfer or declaration for use and benefit of husband and wife, for whom survivorship is presumed, a right of survivorship does not exist unless the instrument creating the custodial trust specifically provides for survivorship.

(b) Custodial trust property held under the Nebraska Uniform Custodial Trust Act by the same custodial trustee for the use and benefit of the same beneficiary may be administered as a single custodial trust.

(c) A custodial trustee of custodial trust property held for more than one beneficiary shall separately account to each beneficiary pursuant to sections 30-3508 and 30-3516 for the administration of the custodial trust.

Laws 1997, LB 51, § 7.